Hawaii statutes.
[§329E-4] Medicaid coverage. The
department of human services shall ensure that opioid antagonists for
outpatient use are covered by the medicaid prescription drug program on the
same basis as other covered drugs. [L 2016, c 68, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next